District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.08

Reciprocal agreements.

The Central Collection Unit may enter into reciprocal agreements for the collection of delinquent debts with any state, local, or municipal government.

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1049, 59 DCR 8025